Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 1. Financial Assistance
[Repealed].

§§ 43-41-1 and 43-41-3.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2004, ch. 405, § 14 effective July 1, 2004.

§43-41-1. [Laws, 1978, ch. 331, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1978.]

§43-41-3. [Laws, 1978, ch. 331, § 2; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 27; Laws, 1989, ch. 474, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1989.]

§ 43-41-5.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 335, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

[Laws, 1978, ch. 331, § 3; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 28]

§§ 43-41-7 through 43-41-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2004, ch. 405, § 14 eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§43-41-7. [Laws, 1978, ch. 331, § 4; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 29; Laws, 1989, ch. 474, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1989.]

§43-41-9. [Laws, 1978, ch. 331, § 5(1); Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 30, eff from and after passage (approved May 9, 1980).]

§43-41-11. [Laws, 1978, ch. 331, § 5(2); Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 31; Laws, 1989, ch. 474, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1989.]

§43-41-13. [Laws, 1978, ch. 331, § 5(3); Laws, 1989, ch. 474, § 4; Laws, 2000, ch. 413, § 4; Laws, 2001, ch. 341, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 11, 2001.)]

§43-41-15. [Laws, 1978, ch. 331, § 5(4); Laws, 1989, ch. 474, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1989.]

§ 43-41-17.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 335, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

[Laws, 1978, ch. 331, § 6]